Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Making College
More Affordable Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3218.7-2 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Research universities within The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education shall not require any in-state student to purchase a meal
plan as a condition:
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2197 Page 1

1. Of enrollment; or
2. For residing in on-campus housing.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
Passed the House of Representatives the 27th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate









ENGR. H. B. NO. 2197 Page 2